Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 11.1. Firearms.

§§ 59.1-148.1,
59.1-148.2.
Repealed by Acts 2004, c. 929.

§ 59.1-148.3.
Purchase of handguns or other weapons of certain officers.

The Department of State Police, the Department of Wildlife Resources, the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority, the Virginia Lottery, the Marine Resources Commission, the Capitol Police, the Department of Conservation and Recreation, the Department
of Forestry, any sheriff, any regional jail board or authority, and any local police department may allow any sworn law-enforcement officer, deputy, or regional jail officer, a local fire department may allow any full-time sworn
fire marshal, the Department of Motor Vehicles may allow any law-enforcement officer, any institution of higher education named in §

23.1-1100

may allow any campus police officer appointed pursuant to Article 3 (§

23.1-809

et seq.) of Chapter 8 of Title 23.1, retiring on or after July 1, 1991, and the Department of Corrections may allow any employee with internal investigations authority designated by the Department of Corrections
pursuant to subdivision 11 of §

53.1-10

who retires (i) after at least 10 years of service, (ii) at 70 years of age or older, or (iii) as a result of a service-incurred disability or who is receiving long-term disability payments for a service-incurred
disability with no expectation of returning to the employment where he incurred the disability to purchase the service handgun issued or previously issued to him by the agency or institution at a price of $1. If the previously
issued weapon is no longer available, a weapon of like kind may be substituted for that weapon. This privilege shall also extend to any former Superintendent of the Department of State Police who leaves service after a minimum
of five years. This privilege shall also extend to any person listed in this subsection who is eligible for retirement with at least 10 years of service who resigns on or after July 1, 1991, in good standing from one of the agencies
listed in this section to accept a position covered by the Virginia Retirement System. Other weapons issued by the agencies listed in this subsection for personal duty use of an officer may, with approval of the agency head, be
sold to the officer subject to the qualifications of this section at a fair market price determined as in subsection B, so long as the weapon is a type and configuration that can be purchased at a regular hardware or sporting goods
store by a private citizen without restrictions other than the instant background check.

The agencies listed in subsection A may allow any sworn law-enforcement officer who retires with five or more years of service, but less than 10, to purchase the service handgun issued to him by the agency at a price equivalent to the weapon’s fair market
value on the date of the officer’s retirement. Any sworn law-enforcement officer employed by any of the agencies listed in subsection A who is retired for disability as a result of a nonservice-incurred disability may purchase
the service handgun issued to him by the agency at a price equivalent to the weapon’s fair market value on the date of the officer’s retirement. Determinations of fair market value may be made by reference to a recognized pricing
guide.

The agencies listed in subsection A may allow the immediate survivor of any sworn law-enforcement officer (i) who is killed in the line of duty or (ii) who dies in service and has at least 10 years of service to purchase the service handgun issued to
the officer by the agency at a price of $1.

The governing board of any institution of higher learning named in §

23.1-1100

may allow any campus police officer appointed pursuant to Article 3 (§

23.1-809

et seq.) of Chapter 8 of Title 23.1 who retires on or after July 1, 1991, to purchase the service handgun issued to him at a price equivalent to the weapon’s fair market value on the date of the officer’s retirement.
Determinations of fair market value may be made by reference to a recognized pricing guide.

Any officer who at the time of his retirement is a sworn law-enforcement officer with a state agency listed in subsection A, when the agency allows purchases of service handguns, and who retires after 10 years of state service, even if a portion of his
service was with another state agency, may purchase the service handgun issued to him by the agency from which he retires at a price of $1.

The sheriff of Hanover County may allow any auxiliary or volunteer deputy sheriff with a minimum of 10 years of service, upon leaving office, to purchase for $1 the service handgun issued to him.

Any sheriff or local police department may allow any auxiliary law-enforcement officer with more than 10 years of service to purchase the service handgun issued to him by the agency at a price that is equivalent to or less than the weapon’s fair market
value on the date of purchase by the officer.

The agencies listed in subsection A may allow any full-time sworn law-enforcement officer currently employed by the agency to purchase his service handgun, with the approval of the chief law-enforcement officer of the agency, at a fair market price. This
subsection shall only apply when the agency has purchased new service handguns for its officers, and the handgun subject to the sale is no longer used by the agency or officer in the course of duty.

History.
1989, c. 175; 1990, c. 359; 1991, c. 389; 1992, cc. 63, 83, 195; 1996, c. 50; 1998, c. 173; 1999, c. 312; 2000, c. 391; 2002, c. 25; 2003, c. 106; 2004, c. 136; 2005, c. 168; 2006, c. 185; 2007, c. 813; 2009, cc. 289, 412;
2010, cc. 590, 864; 2011, c. 628; 2012, c. 218; 2013, c. 62; 2014, c. 225; 2015, cc. 38, 730; 2016, cc. 196, 210, 215; 2019, c. 608; 2020, c. 958; 2022, cc. 245, 246.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, c. 813, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the powers of any locality with respect to any ordinance, resolution or bylaw validly adopted and not repealed or rescinded prior to July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2015, cc. 38 and 730, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2017, cc. 698 and 707, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 15, 2018, except that the provisions of the (i) thirteenth, fourteenth, and fifteenth enactments
of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2015; (ii) third enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2018; and (iii) eleventh enactment of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”

Acts 2016, c. 41, cl. 1 provides: “Any conservation police officer who (i) has at least 20 years of service as a conservation police officer, (ii) was a full-time sworn conservation police officer immediately prior to January 1, 2016, and (iii) was transitioned
to a civilian position on January 1, 2016, by the Department of Game and Inland Fisheries shall be considered a retired law-enforcement officer for the purposes of §§

9.1-1000

,

18.2-308

,

18.2-308.03

, and 59.1-148.3.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “23.1-1100” was substituted for “23-14” in subsections A and D; “Article 3 (§

23.1-809

et seq.) of Chapter 8 of Title 23.1” was substituted for “Chapter 17 (§ 23-232 et seq.) of Title 23” in subsections A and D to conform to the recodification of Title 23 by Acts 2016, c. 588, effective October 1, 2016.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 391 substituted “officer, deputy, or any former Superintendent of the Department of State Police who leaves service after a minimum of five years” for “officer or deputy” in subsection A.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 25, in subsection A, inserted “any regional jail board or authority” and substituted “or regional jail officer” for “or any former Superintendent of the Department of State Police who leaves service after a minimum of five years”
in the first sentence, and inserted the present second sentence.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 106 substituted “20” for “twenty” and “$1” for “one dollar” throughout the section; in subsection G, substituted “15” for “fifteen”; and added subsection H.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 136 inserted “the Department of Conservation and Recreation, the Department of Forestry” following “the Capitol Police” in the first sentence of subsection A.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 168 added subsection I.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 185, in subsection F, deleted “The Department of State Police may allow” at the beginning, inserted “with a state agency listed in subsection A,” substituted “agency from which he retires” for “Department,” and made minor stylistic
changes.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 813 substituted “Hanover County” for “any county with a population between 63,000 and 65,000” in subsection G.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 289 inserted “or who is receiving long-term disability payments for a service-incurred disability with no expectation of returning to the employment where he incurred the disability” in the first sentence of subsection A.

The 2009 amendment by c. 412 inserted “the State Lottery Department” preceding “the Marine Resources Commission” in the first sentence of subsection A.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 590, in subsection A, in the first sentence, inserted the clause (i) and (iii) designators and inserted clause (ii).

The 2010 amendment by c. 864 inserted the third sentence in subsection A.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 628, in subsection A, in the first sentence, inserted “or previously issued” in clause (iii), and added the second sentence.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 218, throughout the section, substituted “15 years” for “20 years” and “listed in subsection A” for “listed above”; substituted “listed above in this subsection” for “listed above” in the next-to-last sentence of subsection A;
deleted subsection E, which formerly read: “The Department of State Police may allow any full-time sworn state police law-enforcement officer who retires as a result of a service-incurred disability and who was on disability leave
at the time the Department issued 10-mm semiautomatic handguns to its officers to purchase one of the 10-mm semiautomatic handguns used by the Department of State Police at a price of $1”; redesignated former subsections F through
I as subsections E through H; and inserted “when the agency allows purchases of service handguns” in subsection E.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 62, substituted “10 years of service” for “15 years of service” throughout the section; deleted “after at least 10 years of service” at the end of clause (ii) of the first sentence of subsection A; substituted “listed in this
section” for “listed above” in the fourth sentence of subsection A; and substituted “5 or more years of service, but less than 10” for “10 or more years of service, but less than 15” in the first sentence of subsection B.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 225 substituted “Virginia Lottery” for “State Lottery Department” in the first sentence of subsection A.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 38 and 730, effective January 15, 2018, are identical and substituted “Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority” for “Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control” in subsection A.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 196 and 215 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “agencies listed in this subsection” for “Department of State Police,” and “agency head” for “Superintendent” in the last sentence; and made minor stylistic changes.
In addition c. 210 inserted “and the Department of Corrections may allow any employee with internal investigations authority designated by the Department of Corrections pursuant to subdivision 11 of §

53.1-10

” in subsection A; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2016 amendment by c. 210 inserted “and the Department of Corrections may allow any employee with internal investigations authority designated by the Department of Corrections pursuant to subdivision 11 of §

53.1-10

” in subsection A and made related and stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 608 deleted “in accordance with written authorization or approval from the local governing body” preceding “may allow” in subsection G.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 958 substituted “Department of Wildlife Resources” for “Department of Game and Inland Fisheries” in subsection A in the first sentence.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 245 and 246 are identical, and in subsections A through C, and E, deleted “full-time” preceding “sworn law-enforcement officer” throughout; and substituted “education” for “learning” in subsection A in the first sentence.

§ 59.1-148.4.
Sale of firearms by law-enforcement agencies prohibited; exception.

A law-enforcement agency of this Commonwealth shall not sell or trade any firearm owned and used or otherwise lawfully in its possession except (i) to another law-enforcement agency of the Commonwealth, (ii) to a licensed firearms dealer, (iii) to the
persons as provided in § 59.1-148.3 or (iv) as authorized by a court in accordance with §

19.2-386.29

.

History.
1994, c. 467; 2004, c. 995.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 995 substituted “19.2-386.29” for “18.2-310” in clause (iv).